District of Columbia statutes.
8-418

Penalties.

(a)

A person violating a provision of this subchapter or of a rule or regulation promulgated pursuant thereto, shall be fined according to the schedule set forth in Chapter 32 of Title 16 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations, or be imprisoned for not more than 90 days, or both.

(b)

The Department may, as set forth by the Mayor in regulations, revoke or suspend the license of a pesticide operator or applicator who violates § 8-433 more than once in a calendar year in a manner that endangers human health or the environment.

Apr. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-70, § 19, 24 DCR 6867
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 414, 32 DCR 4450
Oct. 23, 2012, D.C. Law 19-191, § 12(e), 59 DCR 10166
1981 Ed., § 6-751.18.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-191 rewrote this section.
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-191: Section 14(a) of D.C. Law 19-191 provided that §§ 1 through 5 and 8 through 13 of the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.